Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,137
Effect of nonprofit conversion.

(MBCA 9.34) (a) When
a conversion of a domestic business corporation to a domestic nonprofit corporation
becomes effective:

(1) The title to all
real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the corporation
remains in the corporation without reversion or impairment;

(2) The liabilities
of the corporation remain the liabilities of the corporation;

(3) An action or proceeding
pending against the corporation continues against the corporation as if the
conversion had not occurred;

(4) The articles of incorporation of the domestic
or foreign nonprofit corporation become effective;

(5) The shares of the corporation
are reclassified into memberships, securities, obligations, rights to acquire
memberships or securities, or into cash or other property in accordance with
the plan of conversion, and the shareholders are entitled only to the rights
provided in the plan of nonprofit conversion or to any rights they may have
under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183; and

(6) The corporation is deemed to:

(i) Be a domestic nonprofit
corporation for all purposes;

(ii) Be the same corporation without interruption
as the corporation that existed prior to the conversion; and

(iii) Have been incorporated
on the date that it was originally incorporated as a domestic business corporation.

(b) When a conversion
of a domestic business corporation to a foreign nonprofit corporation becomes
effective, the foreign nonprofit corporation is deemed to agree that it will
promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under
sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(c) The owner liability of a shareholder in a domestic
business corporation that converts to a domestic nonprofit corporation shall
be as follows:

(1)
The conversion does not discharge any owner liability of the shareholder as
a shareholder of the business corporation to the extent any such owner liability
arose before the effective time of the articles of nonprofit conversion;

(2) The shareholder
shall not have owner liability for any debt, obligation, or liability of the
nonprofit corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles
of nonprofit conversion;

(3) The laws of this state shall continue to apply
to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision
(1) of this subsection as if the conversion had not occurred and the nonprofit
corporation was still a business corporation; and

(4) The shareholder shall have
whatever rights of contribution from other shareholders that are provided
by the laws of this state with respect to any owner liability preserved by
subdivision (1) of this subsection as if the conversion had not occurred and
the nonprofit corporation were still a business corporation.

(d) A shareholder who
becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations,
or liabilities of the nonprofit corporation shall have owner liability only
for those debts, obligations, or liabilities of the nonprofit corporation
that arise after the effective time of the articles of nonprofit conversion.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 137.